Utah statutes.
41-6a-1709.   Coasting prohibited.
(1)  The operator of a motor vehicle, when traveling on a downgrade, may not
coast with the gears or transmission of the vehicle in neutral.
(2)  The operator of a truck or bus, when traveling on a downgrade, may not
coast with the clutch disengaged.
